Arkansas, session 2025, SB142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Bell to Bell, No Cell
Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds:
(1) The rise of cell phone and social media use by young people
is leading to unintended and, at times, harmful consequences to the academic
and mental well-being of young people; and
(2) Students, parents, teachers, and education leaders are
grappling with the tension between protecting students' safety, well-being,
*TNL097*
02-12-2025 09:41:40 TNL097

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 SB142
and learning experiences while allowing safe and reasonable access to new,
innovative tools for communication.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to offer solutions to the
challenges posed by the use of cell phones and social media by young people
in order to provide safe school environments that are conducive to learning
while also protecting the rights of students and parents to freely and openly
communicate.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-18-515 is amended to read as follows:
6-18-515. Use of personal electronic devices — Definition Definitions.
(a) As used in this section, “personal electronic device”:
(1) "Emergency" means a serious, unexpected, and dangerous
situation that requires immediate action, including without limitation:
(A) An active fire;
(B) An active tornado or earthquake;
(C) An active shooter;
(D) An evacuation of school grounds; or
(E) A medical emergency;
(2) "Personal electronic device" means without limitation a:
(1)(A) Cellular telephone;
(2)(B) Paging device;
(3)(C) Beeper;
(4)(D) Mobile telephone that offers advanced computing and
internet accessibility;
(5)(E) Digital media player;
(6)(F) Portable game console;
(7)(G) Tablet, notebook, or laptop computer;
(8)(H) Digital camera; and
(9)(I) Digital video or audio recorder;
(J) Smart watch; and
(K) Device that can connect and transmit data through
Bluetooth technology; and
(3) "School day" means from the time students are required to be
at school until the time students are dismissed from school.
(b)(1) A By the 2025-2026 school year, each public school district may
and open-enrollment public charter school shall establish a written student
02-12-2025 09:41:40 TNL097

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 SB142
discipline policy and exemptions concerning the possession and use by a
student of a personal electronic device during the school day:
(1)(A) On school property; and
(2) At an after-school activity; or
(3)(B) At a school-related function.
(2) Each public school district and open-enrollment public
charter school shall submit its policy and exemptions concerning the
possession and use by a student of a personal electronic device required
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section to the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education for review and approval or disapproval.
(c) The policy may shall, without limitation:
(1) Allow or restrict Restrict the possession and use of a
personal electronic device during the school day;
(2) Allow the use of a personal electronic device in school for
instructional purposes at the discretion of a teacher or administrator
Prohibit the use of a personal electronic device during the school day;
(3) Limit the times or locations in which a personal electronic
device may be used to make telephone calls, send text messages or emails, or
engage in other forms of communication;
(4) Allow or prohibit the use of any photographic, audio, or
video recording capabilities of a personal electronic device while in school;
(5) Exempt the possession or use of a personal electronic device
by a student who is required to use such a device for health or another
compelling reason reasons;
(6)(4) Exempt the possession or use of a personal electronic
device after normal a school hours day for extracurricular activities; and
(7) Include other relevant provisions deemed appropriate and
necessary by the school district (5) Exempt the possession or use of a
personal electronic device during an emergency; and
(6) Exempt the possession or use of a personal electronic device
during the school day if the personal electronic device is issued to a
student by a public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school for use during the school day.
(d)(1) A policy adopted and implemented under this section may include
an exemption of the possession or use of a personal electronic device by a
student during a special event that occurs during the school day.
02-12-2025 09:41:40 TNL097

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 SB142
(2) The division shall promulgate rules defining what
constitutes a special event that occurs during the school day.
(e) A policy adopted and implemented under this section shall not
prohibit a student from using a personal electronic device during the school
day if the use of the personal electronic device is: (1) Included in the
student's:
(A) Individualized education program developed under the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2025; or
(B) Plan developed under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act
of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(2) Required for a student who is enrolled in an endorsed
concurrent enrollment course at an institution of higher education in order
to utilize two-factor authentication to access course work and resources for
the endorsed concurrent enrollment course.
(f) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall publish on its website its personal electronic device policy
required under this section before the first day of the school year each
year.
(g) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school that fails to adopt or enforce the personal electronic device policy
required under this section, as determined by the division, shall be cited
for a violation of the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools
and School Districts.
(h) A public school district or an open-enrollment public charter
school shall not be liable for a personal electronic device that is
confiscated under the public school district's or open-enrollment public
charter school's personal electronic device policy required under this
section if the personal electronic device is lost, stolen, or damaged.
(i) The division shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this
section, including without limitation rules that:
(1) Govern the process for monitoring compliance with this
section; and
(2) Establish the process for approving or disapproving a policy
submitted to the division by a public school district or an open-enrollment
public charter school as required under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
02-12-2025 09:41:40 TNL097

As Engrossed: H2/12/25 SB142

/s/Dees


































02-12-2025 09:41:40 TNL097